Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SAINT PAUL POLICE DEPARTMENT.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development to provide a grant to the Saint Paul Police Department for a Minnesota Trades Academy. The academy must specifically seek to position youth for careers in the construction industry, provide driver's training, and prioritize youth to divert them from risk of involvement in gang or gun violence. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end